Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-308
Assessment life associations; new associations prohibited.

No life insurance company or association, other than fraternal benefit society, which issues contracts, the performance of which is contingent upon the payment of assessments or calls made upon its members, shall be hereafter organized to do business within this state. All such companies or associations as are now licensed to do business within the state on such plans may continue and carry on the business of insurance on the plan under which they are organized and doing business July 17, 1913, without being required to value their assessment policies or certificates of membership as yearly renewal term contracts.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 150, p. 470;

R.S.1913, § 3287;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XI, § 15, p. 652;

C.S.1922, § 7894;

C.S.1929, § 44-1115;

R.S.1943, § 44-308;

Laws 1987, LB 17, § 2.